Massachusetts, session 194th, S2643.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, Edward J. Walsh, chief of police for the city of Taunton, may
continue to serve in such position until he reaches 70 years of age, the date of his retirement or
the date he is relieved of his duties, whichever occurs first; provided, however, that Edward J.
Walsh is mentally and physically capable of performing the duties of the chief of police. The city
of Taunton may, at its own expense, require that Edward J. Walsh be examined annually by a
physician designated by the city of Taunton, to determine Edward J. Walsh’s physical and
mental capability to remain in service. No further deductions shall be made from the regular
compensation of Edward J. Walsh under said chapter 32 for any service performed subsequent to
his reaching the age of 65 and, upon retirement, Edward J. Walsh shall receive a superannuation
retirement allowance equal to that which he would have been entitled had he retired at the age of
65.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2